Utah statutes.
17-35b-301.   "General county (modified)" structural form of county
government.
(1)  The structural form of county government known as the "general county
(modified)" form retains, without change or modification, except to the extent
that changes or modifications may be effectuated under other proceedings
authorized by law, all existing incorporated cities and towns, special taxing
districts, public authorities, county service areas, and other local public
entities functioning within the boundaries of the county.  Under this form of
government, the county remains vested with all powers and duties vested in
counties by general law, but the county legislative body, together with such
other officers as may be specified in the optional plan, shall be elected or
appointed in the manner authorized by this act and as provided in the optional
plan.
(2)  An optional plan for this form of county government shall provide for the
election of a county council, composed of not less than three members, which
shall be the county legislative body and shall exercise all legislative powers
authorized by law.  The plan shall specify:
(a)  whether the members of the council are to be elected from districts, at
large, or by a combination of district and at-large constituencies;
(b)  their qualifications and terms of office, and whether such terms are
concurrent or overlapping;
(c)  grounds for and methods of removal of council members from office;
(d)  procedures for filling vacancies on the council, provided that the
procedures shall conform with Section 20A-1-508; and
(e)  the compensation, if any, of council members together with procedures for
prescribing and changing such compensation from time to time.
